src/ruleset/rules_phase5.foma
#Before converting diphthongs into IPA, a last case to decide


#Apply les diphthongs

define CSegStart [.#. | "-"] ["#"|",#"];

#the :| distinction is not useful anymore
define EliminateComplexMarker [":"|"|"] -> 0;

#The digraphs kn, pn, gn, cn become n at the begining of a segment
define Digraphs1 ["k" | "p" | "g" | "c"] "n" -> "n" || CSegStart _;

#ph is always f
define Digraphs2 "p" "h" -> "f" || NotInAntL _ ;

#ch is always ch
define Digraphs3 "c" "h" -> "t" "ʃ" || NotInAntL _;

#sh is always sh
define Digraphs4 "s" "h" -> "ʃ" || NotInAntL _;

#ps is s at begining of seg
define Digraphs5 "p" "s" -> "s" || CSegStart _;

#rh is r at begining of segment
define Digraphs6 "r" "h" -> "ɹ" || CSegStart _;

#pt is p at begining of segment
define Digraphs7 "p" "t" -> "t" || CSegStart _;

#th is voiced before vowel and voiceless otherwise
define Digraphs8 "t" "h" -> "ð" || NotInAntL _ ["@"|",@"]
                .o. "t" "h" -> "θ" || NotInAntL _;

#gg -> g
define Digraphs9 "g" "g" -> "g" || NotInAntL _;

#ss -> s
define Digraphs10 "s" "s" -> "s" || NotInAntL _;

define Phase39 EliminateComplexMarker .o. Digraphs1 .o. Digraphs2 .o. Digraphs3 .o. Digraphs4 .o. Digraphs5
            .o. Digraphs6 .o. Digraphs7 .o. Digraphs8 .o. Digraphs9 .o. Digraphs10;
